North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-52.1 Uniform Group Insurance Program

54-52.1-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the public employees retirement board.

“Carrier” means:

For the hospital benefits coverage, an insurance company authorized to do business in the state, or a nonprofit hospital service association, or a prepaid group practice hospital care plan authorized to do business in the state, or the state if a self-insurance health plan is used for providing hospital benefits coverage.

For the medical benefits coverage, an insurance company authorized to do business in the state, or a nonprofit medical service association, or a prepaid group practice medical care plan authorized to do business in the state, or the state if a self-insurance health plan is used for providing medical benefits coverage.

For the life insurance benefits coverage, an insurance company authorized to do business in the state.

“Department, board, or agency” means the departments, boards, agencies, or associations of this state. The term includes the state’s charitable, penal, and higher educational institutions; the Bank of North Dakota; the state mill and elevator association; and counties, cities, district health units, and school districts.

“Eligible employee” means every permanent employee who is employed by a governmental unit, as that term is defined in section 54-52-01. “Eligible employee” includes members of the legislative assembly, judges of the supreme court, paid members of state or political subdivision boards, commissions, or associations, full-time employees of political subdivisions, elective state officers as defined by section 54-06-01, and disabled permanent employees who are receiving compensation from the North Dakota workforce safety and insurance fund. As used in this subsection, “permanent employee” means one whose services are not limited in duration, who is filling an approved and regularly funded position in a governmental unit, and who is employed at least seventeen and one-half hours per week and at least five months each year or for those first employed after August 1, 2003, is employed at least twenty hours per week and at least twenty weeks each year of employment. For purposes of sections 54-52.1-04.1, 54-52.1-04.7, 54-52.1-04.8, and 54-52.1-11, “eligible employee” includes retired and terminated employees who remain eligible to participate in the uniform group insurance program pursuant to applicable state or federal law.

“Health insurance benefits coverage” means hospital benefits coverage or medical benefits coverage, or both.

“Health maintenance organization” means an organization certified to establish and operate a health maintenance organization in compliance with chapter 26.1-18.1.

“Hospital benefits coverage” means a plan that either provides coverage for, or pays, or reimburses expenses for hospital services incurred in accordance with the uniform contract.

“Life insurance benefits coverage” means a plan that provides both term life insurance and accidental death and dismemberment insurance in amounts determined by the board, with a minimum of one thousand dollars provided for the term life insurance portion of the coverage.

“Medical benefits coverage” means a plan that either provides coverage for, or pays, or reimburses expenses for medical services in accordance with the uniform contract.

“Member contribution” means the payment by the member into the retiree health benefits fund pursuant to sections 54-52-02.9 and 54-52-17.4.

“Member’s account balance” means the member’s contributions plus interest at the rate set by the board.

“Self-insurance health plan” means a plan of self-insurance providing health insurance benefits coverage under section 54-52.1-04.2.

“Temporary employee” means a governmental unit employee who is not filling an approved and regularly funded position in an eligible governmental unit and whose services may or may not be limited in duration.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 517, § 1; 1981, ch. 312, § 12; 1981, ch. 552, §§ 2, 3; 1983, ch. 319, § 33; 1983, ch. 580, § 1; 1987, ch. 657, § 1; 1987, ch. 658, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 62; 1989, ch. 664, § 3; 1989, ch. 665, § 3; 1989, ch. 673, § 1; 1989, ch. 674, § 1; 1991, ch. 630, § 9; 2001, ch. 496, § 2; 2003, ch. 48, § 35; 2003, ch. 499, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2019, ch. 462, § 3, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-02.
Uniform group insurance program created — Formation into subgroups.

In order to promote the economy and efficiency of employment in the state’s service, reduce personnel turnover, and offer an incentive to high-grade individuals to enter and remain in the service of state employment, there is created a uniform group insurance program. The uniform group must be composed of eligible and retired employees and be formed to provide hospital benefits coverage, medical benefits coverage, and life insurance benefits coverage in the manner set forth in this chapter. The uniform group may be divided into the following subgroups at the discretion of the board:

Medical and hospital benefits coverage group consisting of active eligible employees and retired employees not eligible for Medicare, except for employees who first retire after July 1, 2015, and are not eligible for Medicare on their retirement. In determining premiums for coverage under this subsection for retired employees not eligible for Medicare, the rate for a non-Medicare retiree single plan is one hundred fifty percent of the active member single plan rate, the rate for a non-Medicare retiree family plan of two people is twice the non-Medicare retiree single plan rate, and the rate for a non-Medicare retiree family plan of three or more persons is two and one-half times the non-Medicare retiree single plan rate.

In addition to the coverage provided in subsection 1, another coverage option may be provided for retired employees not eligible for Medicare, except for employees who first retire after July 1, 2015, and are not eligible for Medicare on their retirement, provided the option does not increase the implicit subsidy as determined by the governmental accounting standards board’s other postemployment benefit reporting procedure. In offering this additional option, the board may have an open enrollment but thereafter enrollment for this option must be as specified in section 54-52.1-03.

Retired Medicare-eligible employee group medical and hospital benefits coverage.

Active eligible employee life insurance benefits coverage.

Retired employee life insurance benefits coverage.

Terminated employee continuation group medical and hospital benefits coverage.

Terminated employee conversion group medical and hospital benefits coverage.

Dental benefits coverage.

Vision benefits coverage.

Long-term care benefits coverage.

Employee assistance benefits coverage.

Prescription drug coverage.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 517, § 2; 1987, ch. 658, § 2; 1989, ch. 675, § 1; 1995, ch. 533, § 2; 1999, ch. 481, § 1; 2007, ch. 486, § 1; 2011, ch. 433, § 1; 2013, ch. 433, § 1.

Note.

This section is set out above to reflect a correction since the 2015 cumulative supplement. The contingent effect on this section was met and is now in effect as presented.

54-52.1-03.
Employee participation in plan — Employee to furnish information — Benefits to continue upon retirement or termination.

Any eligible employee may be enrolled in the uniform group insurance program created by this chapter by requesting enrollment with the employing department. If an eligible employee does not enroll in the uniform group insurance program at the time of beginning employment, in order to enroll at a later time the eligible employee must meet minimum requirements established by the board. An employing department may not require an active eligible employee to request coverage under the uniform group insurance program as a prerequisite to receive the minimum employer-paid life insurance benefits coverage or employee assistance program benefits coverage.

A retiree who has accepted a periodic distribution from the defined contribution retirement plan pursuant to section 54-52.6-13 who the board determines is eligible for participation in the uniform group insurance program or has accepted a retirement allowance from the public employees retirement system, the highway patrolmen’s retirement system, the teachers’ insurance and annuity association of America - college retirement equities fund for service credit earned while employed by North Dakota institutions of higher education, the retirement system established by job service North Dakota under section 52-11-01, the judges’ retirement system established under chapter 27-17, or the teachers’ fund for retirement may elect to participate in the uniform group under this chapter without meeting minimum requirements at age sixty-five, when the member’s spouse reaches age sixty-five, upon the receipt of a benefit, or when the spouse terminates employment. If a retiree or surviving spouse does not elect to participate at the times specified in this subsection, the retiree or surviving spouse must meet the minimum requirements established by the board. Subject to sections 54-52.1-03.2 and 54-52.1-03.3, each retiree or surviving spouse shall pay directly to the board the premiums in effect for the coverage then being provided. A retiree or surviving spouse who has met the initial eligibility requirements of this subsection to begin participation in the uniform group insurance program remains eligible as long as the retiree maintains the retiree’s participation in the program by paying the required premium pursuant to rules adopted by the board.

Upon the termination of employment when the employee is not eligible to participate under subsection 2 or 4 or applicable federal law, that employee cannot continue as a member of the uniform group.

A member or former member of the legislative assembly or that individual’s surviving spouse may elect to continue membership in the uniform group within the applicable time limitations after either termination of eligible employment as a member of the legislative assembly or termination of other eligible employment or, for a surviving spouse, upon the death of the member or former member of the legislative assembly. The member or former member of the legislative assembly or that individual’s surviving spouse shall pay the premiums in effect for the coverage provided directly to the board.

Each eligible employee requesting enrollment shall furnish the appropriate individual in the employing department, board, or agency with such information and in such form as prescribed by the board to enable the enrollment of the employee, or employee and dependents, in the uniform group insurance program created by this chapter.

If the participating employee is a faculty member in a state charitable, penal, or educational institution who receives a salary or wages on less than a twelve-month basis and has signed a contract to teach for the next ensuing school year, the agency shall make arrangements to include that employee in the insurance program on a twelve-month basis and make the contribution authorized by this section for each month of the twelve-month period.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 517, § 3; 1975, ch. 491, § 1; 1983, ch. 194, § 3; 1985, ch. 205, § 3; 1985, ch. 588, § 1; 1987, ch. 659, § 1; 1989, ch. 445, § 4; 1989, ch. 675, § 2; 1993, ch. 535, § 1; 2001, ch. 496, § 3; 2003, ch. 499, § 2; 2009, ch. 514, §
12; 2011, ch. 431, § 10; 2015, ch. 259, § 10, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 372, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 10 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

54-52.1-03.1.
Certain political subdivisions authorized to join uniform group insurance program — Employer contribution.

If eligible under federal law, a political subdivision may extend the benefits of the uniform group insurance program under this chapter to its permanent employees, subject to minimum requirements established by the board and a minimum period of participation of sixty months. If the political subdivision withdraws from participation in the uniform group insurance program, before completing sixty months of participation, unless federal or state laws or rules are modified or interpreted in a way that makes participation by the political subdivision in the uniform group insurance program no longer allowable or appropriate, the political subdivision shall make payment to the board in an amount equal to any expenses incurred in the uniform group insurance program that exceed income received on behalf of the political subdivision’s employees as determined under rules adopted by the board. The Garrison Diversion Conservancy District, and district health units required to participate in the public employees retirement system under section 54-52-02, shall participate in the uniform group insurance program under the same terms and conditions as state agencies. A retiree who has accepted a retirement allowance from a participating political subdivision’s retirement plan may elect to participate in the uniform group under this chapter without meeting minimum requirements at age sixty-five, when the employee’s spouse reaches age sixty-five, upon the receipt of a benefit, when the political subdivision joins the uniform group insurance plan if the retiree was a member of the former plan, or when the spouse terminates employment. If a retiree or surviving spouse does not elect to participate at the times specified in this section, the retiree or surviving spouse must meet the minimum requirements established by the board. Each retiree or surviving spouse shall pay directly to the board the premiums in effect for the coverage then being provided. The board may require documentation that the retiree has accepted a retirement allowance from an eligible retirement plan other than the public employees retirement system.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 552, § 1; 1989, ch. 665, § 4; 1989, ch. 673, § 2; 1993, ch. 535, § 2; 1995, ch. 528, § 6; 2003, ch. 499, § 3; 2003, ch. 500, § 1; 2007, ch. 485, § 2; 2013, ch. 434, § 1; 2015, ch. 259, § 11, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 11 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 434, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

54-52.1-03.2.
Retiree health benefits fund — Appropriation.

The board shall establish a retiree health benefits fund account with the Bank of North Dakota for the purpose of prefunding and providing hospital benefits coverage, medical benefits coverage, and prescription drug coverage under any health insurance program and dental, vision, and long-term care benefits coverage under the uniform group insurance program for retired eligible employees or surviving spouses of retired eligible employees and their dependents as provided in this chapter.

The state shall contribute monthly to the retiree health benefits fund an amount equal to one and fourteen hundredths percent of the monthly salaries and wages of all participating members of the highway patrolmen’s retirement system under chapter 39-03.1, and one and fourteen hundredths percent of the monthly salaries of all supreme or district court judges who are participating members of the public employees retirement system under chapter 54-52.

Each governmental unit that contributes to the public employees retirement system fund under section 54-52-06 or the retirement plan under chapter 54-52.6 shall contribute monthly to the retiree health benefits fund an amount equal to one and fourteen-hundredths percent of the monthly salaries or wages of all participating members of the public employees retirement system under chapter 54-52 or chapter 54-52.6, except for:

Members first enrolled after December 31, 2019, for which a governmental unit contributes to the public employees retirement system fund under section 54-52-06 or the retirement plan under chapter 54-52.6; and

Nonteaching employees of the superintendent of public instruction who elect to participate in the public employees retirement system pursuant to section 54-52-02.13 and employees of the state board for career and technical education who elect to participate in the public employees retirement system pursuant to section 54-52-02.14.

For nonteaching employees of the superintendent of public instruction who elect to participate in the public employees retirement system pursuant to section 54-52-02.13, the superintendent of public instruction shall contribute monthly to the retiree health benefits fund an amount equal to three and twenty-four hundredths percent of the monthly salaries or wages of those nonteaching employee members, beginning on the first of the month following the transfer under section 54-52-02.13 and continuing thereafter for a period of eight years, after which time the superintendent of public instruction shall contribute one and fourteen-hundredths percent of the monthly salary or wages of those nonteaching employee members.

For employees of the state board for career and technical education who elect to participate in the public employees retirement system pursuant to section 54-52-02.14, the state board for career and technical education shall contribute monthly to the retiree health benefits fund an amount equal to two and ninety-nine hundredths percent of the monthly salary or wages of those employee members, beginning on the first of the month following the transfer under section 54-52-02.14 and continuing thereafter for a period of eight years, after which time the state board for career and technical education shall contribute one and fourteen-hundredths percent of the monthly salary or wages of those employee members.

The employer of a national guard security officer or firefighter shall contribute monthly to the retiree health benefits fund an amount equal to one and fourteen-hundredths percent of the monthly salaries or wages of all national guard security officers or firefighters participating in the public employees retirement system under chapter 54-52.

Job service North Dakota shall reimburse monthly the retiree health benefits fund for credit received under section 54-52.1-03.3 by members of the retirement program established by job service North Dakota under section 52-11-01.

The board, as trustee of the fund and in exclusive control of its administration, shall:

Provide for the investment and disbursement of moneys of the retiree health benefits fund and administrative expenditures in the same manner as moneys of the public employees retirement system are invested, disbursed, or expended.

Adopt rules necessary for the proper administration of the retiree health benefits fund, including enrollment procedures.

All moneys deposited in the fund established under subsection 1, not otherwise appropriated, are hereby appropriated to the board for the purpose of making investments for the fund and to make contributions toward hospital and medical benefits coverage and prescription drug coverage under any health insurance program and for any dental, vision, and long-term care benefits coverage under any insurance program for eligible retired employees or surviving spouses of eligible retired employees and their dependents as elected.

If a member terminates employment because of death, permanent and total disability, or any voluntary or involuntary reason before retirement, the member or the member’s designated beneficiary is entitled to the member’s account balance at termination. If a member’s account balance is withdrawn, the member relinquishes all rights to benefits under the retiree health benefits fund.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 445, § 5; 1991, ch. 626, § 6; 1991, ch. 627, § 4; 1991, ch. 630, § 10; 1991, ch. 634, § 1; 1993, ch. 536, § 1; 1999, ch. 482, § 4; 2003, ch. 34, § 18; 2007, ch. 483, § 4; 2009, ch. 513, § 3; 2013, ch. 433, § 2; 2019, ch. 459, § 3, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 439, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

54-52.1-03.3.
Eligibility for retiree health benefits — Fixed contribution and reduction factors.

The following individuals are entitled to receive credit for hospital benefits coverage, medical benefits coverage, and prescription drug coverage under any health insurance program and for any dental, vision, and long-term care benefits coverage under any insurance program:

A member or surviving spouse of the highway patrolmen’s retirement system is eligible for the credit beginning on the date retirement benefits are effective.

If the member first enrolled before January 1, 2020, a member or surviving spouse of the public employees retirement system is eligible for the credit beginning on the date retirement benefits are effective.

A member or surviving spouse of the retirement program established by job service North Dakota under section 52-11-01 is eligible for the credit beginning on the date retirement benefits are effective.

A retired judge or surviving spouse of the retirement program established under chapter 27-17 is eligible for the credit beginning on the date retirement benefits are effective.

If the former participating member first enrolled before January 1, 2020, a former participating member of the defined contribution retirement plan receiving retirement benefits, or the surviving spouse of a former participating member of that retirement plan who was eligible to receive or was receiving benefits, under section 54-52.6-13, is eligible as determined by the board pursuant to the board’s rules.

The board shall calculate the allowable monthly credit toward hospital benefits coverage, medical benefits coverage, and prescription drug coverage under any health insurance program and toward dental, vision, and long-term care benefits coverage under any insurance program under subsection 1 in an amount equal to five dollars multiplied by the member’s or deceased member’s number of years of credited service under the highway patrolmen’s retirement system, the public employees retirement system, the retirement program established by job service North Dakota under section 52-11-01, or the judges’ retirement program established under chapter 27-17. For a member of the public employees retirement system receiving an early retirement benefit or the surviving spouse of that member, or a former participating member of the defined contribution retirement plan who is receiving a periodic distribution and would not meet the normal retirement provisions of the public employees retirement system, the allowable monthly credit must be reduced by three percent if the member terminates employment within one year before attaining the age of sixty-five and an additional reduction factor of six percent applies for each year the member terminates employment before attaining the age of sixty-four. For a member of the highway patrolmen’s retirement system receiving an early retirement benefit or the surviving spouse of that member, the allowable monthly credit must be reduced by three percent if the member terminates employment within one year before attaining the age of fifty-five and an additional reduction factor of six percent applies for each year the member terminates employment before attaining the age of fifty-four. For a member of the retirement program established by job service North Dakota under section 52-11-01 receiving an early retirement benefit or a discontinued service annuity under the plan provisions of that retirement program or the surviving spouse of that member, the allowable monthly credit must be reduced by three percent if the member terminates employment within one year before attaining the age of sixty-five and an additional reduction factor of six percent applies for each year the member terminates employment before attaining the age of sixty-four.

The board shall apply the credit allowable under subsection 2 as elected by the eligible participant to the payment of monthly premiums required of each individual eligible under subsection 1 for hospital benefits coverage , medical benefits coverage, and prescription drug coverage under any health insurance program and for dental, vision, and long-term care benefits coverage under any insurance program. The board shall allow spouses who each have credit under subsection 2 to combine the spouses’ credits and shall apply the combined credit to the required monthly premiums as elected pursuant to this subsection. However, if the allowable credit under any circumstance exceeds the monthly premium in effect for selected coverage, that amount of the credit which exceeds the premium is forfeited and may not be used for any other purpose.

As an alternative to the calculation of the allowable monthly credit under subsection 2, the board may provide actuarially reduced benefit options for the member and the member’s surviving spouse, including a one hundred percent joint and survivor option or a fifty percent joint and survivor option.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 445, § 5; 1991, ch. 627, § 5; 1991, ch. 633, § 2; 1991, ch. 634, § 2; 1993, ch. 536, § 3; 1997, ch. 466, § 1; 2001, ch. 496, § 4; 2003, ch. 498, § 16; 2007, ch. 486, § 2; 2009, ch. 513, § 4; 2013, ch. 433, § 3; 2017, ch. 372, § 6, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 461, § 4, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 463, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 439, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 54-52.1-03.3 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 4 of Chapter 459, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2046; and Section 2 of Chapter 463, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2045.

54-52.1-03.4.
Temporary employees and employees on unpaid leave of absence. [Contingent expiration date – See note]

A temporary employee employed before August 1, 2007, may elect to participate in the uniform group insurance program by completing the necessary enrollment forms and qualifying under the medical underwriting requirements of the program if such election is made before January 1, 2015, and if the temporary employee is participating in the uniform group insurance program on January 1, 2015. In order for a temporary employee employed after July 31, 2007, to qualify to participate in the uniform group insurance program, the employee must be employed at least twenty hours per week; must be employed at least twenty weeks each year of employment; must make the election to participate before January 1, 2015; and must be participating in the uniform group insurance program as of January 1, 2015. To be eligible to participate in the uniform group insurance program, a temporary employee first employed after December 31, 2014, or any temporary employee not participating in the uniform group insurance program as of January 1, 2015, must meet the definition of a full-time employee under section 4980H(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 4980H(c)(4)]. Monthly, the temporary employee or the temporary employee’s employer shall pay to the board the premiums in effect for the coverage being provided. In the case of a temporary employee who is an applicable taxpayer as defined in section 36B(c)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 36B(c)(1)(A)], the temporary employee’s required contribution for medical and hospital benefits self-only coverage may not exceed the maximum employee required contribution specified under section 36B(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 36B(c)(2)(C)], and the employer shall pay any difference between the maximum employee required contribution for medical and hospital benefits self-only coverage and the cost of the premiums in effect for this coverage. An employer may pay health or life insurance premiums for a permanent employee on an unpaid leave of absence. A political subdivision, department, board, or agency may make a contribution for coverage under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 664, § 4; 1993, ch. 537, § 1; 2007, ch. 486, § 3; 2009, ch. 514, § 13; 2013, ch. 434, § 2; 2015, ch. 259, § 12, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 11 of chapter 372, S.L. 2017 provides, “

CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE - EXPIRATION DATE.

Section 7 of this Act becomes effective on the date identified by the executive director of the public employees retirement system in a certification to the legislative council as the effective date of a repeal of
sections 4980H(a) and
4980H(b) of the Internal Revenue Code [ 26 U.S.C. 4980H(a) and
490H(b)] or the effective date of an amendment of
sections 4980H(a) and
4980H(b) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 4980H(a) and
490H(b)] resulting in the assessable payments under sections 4980H(a) and 4980H(b) [26 U.S.C. 4980H(a) and
490H(b)] becoming zero dollars. If this certification does not occur before August 1, 2019, Section 7 of this Act expires and is ineffective.”

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 12 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 434, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

54-52.1-03.4.
Temporary employees and employees on unpaid leave of absence. [Contingent effective date – See note]

A temporary employee employed before August 1, 2007, may elect to participate in the uniform group insurance program by completing the necessary enrollment forms and qualifying under the medical underwriting requirements of the program if such election is made before January 1, 2015, and if the temporary employee is participating in the uniform group insurance program on January 1, 2015.

In order for a temporary employee employed after July 31, 2007, to qualify to participate in the uniform group insurance program, the employee must be employed at least twenty hours per week; must be employed at least twenty weeks each year of employment; must make the election to participate before January 1, 2015; and must be participating in the uniform group insurance program as of January 1, 2015.

A temporary employee first employed after December 31, 2014, or any temporary employee employed before the effective date of this section of this Act but not participating in the uniform group insurance program on the effective date of this section of this Act, does not qualify to participate in the uniform group insurance program, unless the employee is employed at least thirty hours per week for at least twenty weeks each year of employment. Notwithstanding contrary provisions of this subsection, a temporary employee participating in the uniform group insurance program on the effective date of this section of this Act remains eligible through the end of the calendar year during which the effective date of this section of this Act occurs and after that calendar year the temporary employee is subject to the eligibility provisions of subsection 1, 2, or 3, as applicable.

Monthly, the temporary employee or the temporary employee’s employer shall pay to the board the premiums in effect for the coverage being provided. An employer may pay health or life insurance premiums for a permanent employee on an unpaid leave of absence. A political subdivision, department, board, or agency may make a contribution for coverage under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 664, § 4; 1993, ch. 537, § 1; 2007, ch. 486, § 3; 2009, ch. 514, § 13; 2013, ch. 434, § 2; contingently amended by 2015, ch. 259, § 12, effective August 1, 2015; contingently amended by 2017, ch. 372, § 7.

54-52.1-03.5.
Emergency responders who die in the line of duty — Health benefits. [Retroactive application — See note]

As used in this section:

“Correctional facility staff” has the same meaning as provided under section 12-44.1-01.

“Dies in the line of duty” means a death occurring as a direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained by an emergency responder while engaged in a line of duty activity or which arose out of and as a result of the individual’s performance of a line of duty activity.

“Emergency responder” means a peace officer, member of a correctional facility staff, emergency medical services personnel, or firefighter, who is employed by the state, a political subdivision of the state, or an institution under the control of the state board of higher education. The term does not include a national guard security officer or national guard firefighter.

“Line of duty activity” means an employment-related action taken by an emergency responder which is required or authorized by law, rule, regulation, or condition of employment and for which compensation is provided by the employing entity or would have been eligible to have been provided by the employing entity if the emergency responder had been on duty at the time the action in question was taken.

“Peace officer” has the same meaning as provided under section 12-63-01. The term includes a game warden.

At no charge, the board shall offer health insurance benefits coverage, including drug benefits coverage, to the surviving spouse and dependent child of an emergency responder who dies in the line of duty. The provision of health insurance benefits coverage under this section includes coverage of a child of the emergency responder who is born within ten months of the date of the death.

The provision of health insurance benefits coverage under this section must continue for the:

Surviving spouse until the surviving spouse reaches age sixty-five; and

Dependent child until the dependent child reaches age twenty-six.

An employer shall notify the board of the qualifying event of an emergency responder dying in the line of duty.

This section does not affect eligibility for benefits under title 65.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 440, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 440, S.L. 2021, provides, “

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION.

This Act applies retroactively to the qualifying event of an emergency responder dying in the line of duty on or after January 1, 2010; however, the benefits under this Act do not begin before August 1, 2021.”

54-52.1-04.
Board to contract for insurance.

The board shall receive bids for the providing of hospital benefits coverage, medical benefits coverage, life insurance benefits coverage for a specified term, and employee assistance program services; may receive bids separately for all or part of the prescription drug benefits coverage component of medical benefits coverage; and shall accept one or more bids of and contract with the carriers the board determines best serve the interests of the state and the state’s eligible employees. Solicitations must be made not later than ninety days before the expiration of an existing uniform group insurance contract. Bids must be solicited by advertisement in a manner selected by the board which will provide reasonable notice to prospective bidders. In preparing bid proposals and evaluating bids, the board may utilize the services of consultants on a contract basis in order that the bids received may be uniformly compared and properly evaluated. In determining which bid, if any, will best serve the interests of eligible employees and the state, the board shall give adequate consideration to the following factors:

The economy to be effected.

The ease of administration.

The adequacy of the coverages.

The financial position of the carrier, with special emphasis on the solvency of the carrier.

The reputation of the carrier and any other information available tending to show past experience with the carrier in matters of claim settlement, underwriting, and services.

The board may reject any or all bids received under this section. If the board rejects all bids received, the board shall again solicit bids as provided in this section.

Under sections 54-52.1-04.1 and 54-52.1-04.2 the board may contract for health benefits coverage through a health maintenance organization or establish a self-insurance health plan.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 517, § 4; 1983, ch. 580, § 2; 1997, ch. 467, § 1; 2007, ch. 486, § 4; 2011, ch. 433, § 2; 2019, ch. 462, § 4, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-04.1.
Health maintenance organization contract — Membership option.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 54-52.1-04, the board may contract with one or more health maintenance organizations to provide eligible employees the option of membership in a health maintenance organization. If it makes such a contract, the board may not require that the health maintenance organization be federally qualified if the health maintenance organization has a certificate of authority issued by the North Dakota insurance commissioner. The contract or contracts must be included in the uniform group insurance program.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 312, § 11; 1989, ch. 676, § 1.

54-52.1-04.2.
Self-insurance health plan.

This section applies to a self-insurance health plan for:

Health insurance and prescription drug benefits coverage;

Health insurance benefits coverage, excluding all or part of prescription drug benefits coverage; or

All or part of prescription drug benefits coverage.

Except for prescription drug coverage under subdivision c of subsection 1, a self-insurance health plan established by the board under this section must be provided under an administrative services only (ASO) contract or a third-party administrator (TPA) contract under the uniform group insurance program. The board may not establish a self-insurance health plan unless the board determines the self-insurance health plan best serves the interests of the state and the state’s eligible employees. If the board determines it is in the best interest of the plan, individual stop-loss coverage insured by a carrier authorized to do business in this state may be made part of a self-insurance health plan.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 580, § 4; 1985, ch. 69, § 5; 1987, ch. 660, § 1; 1989, ch. 677, § 1; 2011, ch. 433, § 3; 2019, ch. 462, § 5, effective March 7, 2019; 2019, ch. 463, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 441, § 1, effective March 9, 2021.

Note.

Section 2 of chapter 441, S.L. 2021, provides, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to self-insurance health plans effective on or after the effective date of this Act.”

Section 54-52.1-04.2 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 463, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2045; and Section 5 of Chapter 462, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1028.